apertium-pl-cs.pl.dix
    <pardef n="ksi/ądz__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ądz</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ędza</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ędzu</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ędza</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ędzem</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ędzu</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęże</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęża</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęży</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ężom</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęży</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ężmi</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ężach</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ęża</l>
          <r>ądz<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chłop__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__chłop"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Tur/ek__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kowi</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiem</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cy</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ków</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ków</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kami</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kach</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cy</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Pola/k__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>k</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kowi</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ka</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kiem</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ku</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cy</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ków</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kom</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ków</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kami</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kach</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cy</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ki</l>
          <r>k<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="szewc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__lekarz_sg"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="PBASE__śpioch_pl"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mechanik"><i>mechani</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Malezyjczyk"><i>Malezyjczy</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agrotechnik"><i>agrotechni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biocybernetyk"><i>biocybernety</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="burłak"><i>burła</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chuderlak"><i>chuderla</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diabetyk"><i>diabety</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dydaktyk"><i>dydakty</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="egocentryk"><i>egocentry</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektrotechnik"><i>elektrotechni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="epileptyk"><i>epilepty</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flegmatyk"><i>flegmaty</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geofizyk"><i>geofizy</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="homiletyk"><i>homilety</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jedynak"><i>jedyna</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komik"><i>komi</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metodyk"><i>metody</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="najemnik"><i>najemni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neandertalczyk"><i>neandertalczy</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nikczemnik"><i>nikczemni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="okrutnik"><i>okrutni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="optyk"><i>opty</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="przewoźnik"><i>przewoźni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rzecznik"><i>rzeczni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samotnik"><i>samotni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="społecznik"><i>społeczni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szabrownik"><i>szabrowni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tępak"><i>tępa</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wieśniak"><i>wieśnia</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zdechlak"><i>zdechla</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="czeladnik"><i>czeladni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dłużnik"><i>dłużni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="junak"><i>juna</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kłusownik"><i>kłusowni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lotnik"><i>lotni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maratończyk"><i>maratończy</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="napastnik"><i>napastni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pełnomocnik"><i>pełnomocni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pokutnik"><i>pokutni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="przyrodnik"><i>przyrodni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spowiednik"><i>spowiedni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zbójnik"><i>zbójni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="śmiertelnik"><i>śmiertelni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="semantyk"><i>semanty</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arytmetyk"><i>arytmety</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cybernetyk"><i>cybernety</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="metafizyk"><i>metafizy</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cynik"><i>cyni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obłudnik"><i>obłudni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podpułkownik"><i>podpułkowni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rodak"><i>roda</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buntownik"><i>buntowni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fanatyk"><i>fanaty</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sceptyk"><i>scepty</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="melancholik"><i>melancholi</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="schizofrenik"><i>schizofreni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="katolik"><i>katoli</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miłośnik"><i>miłośni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ochotnik"><i>ochotni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prawnik"><i>prawni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uczestnik"><i>uczestni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wojownik"><i>wojowni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zawodnik"><i>zawodni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Turek"><i>Tur</i><par n="Tur/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Polak"><i>Pola</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Argentyńczyk"><i>Argentyńczy</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Wietnamczyk"><i>Wietnamczy</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Macedończyk"><i>Macedończy</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Chińczyk"><i>Chińczy</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chłopak"><i>chłopa</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="szewc"><i>szewc</i><par n="szewc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ksiądz"><i>ksi</i><par n="ksi/ądz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chłop"><i>chłop</i><par n="chłop__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alkoholik"><i>alkoholi</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laik"><i>lai</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ogrodnik"><i>ogrodni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rolnik"><i>rolni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Słowak"><i>Słowa</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zakładnik"><i>zakładni</i><par n="Pola/k__n"/></e>
